Massachusetts, session 194th, S2880.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 15A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 15G the following section:-
Section 15H. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Adjunct faculty”, faculty employed at 1 or more public institutions of higher education,
as defined in section 5 of chapter 15A, on a semester-by-semester basis.
“Impacted adjunct faculty”, adjunct faculty, as defined in this section, who cumulatively
work half-time or more at 1 or more public institutions of higher education.
(b) There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a Full-Time
Faculty Pilot Fund, hereafter referred to as the fund, to be administered by the department. The
fund shall be credited with: (i) revenue from appropriations or other money authorized by the
general court and specifically designated to the fund; (ii) interest earned on such revenues; and
of 7

(iii) funds from public and private sources, including, but not limited to, gifts, grants and
donations. Amounts credited to the fund shall not be subject to further appropriation, and any
money remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund.
Amounts received from private sources shall be approved by the department and subject to
review before deposit into the fund to ensure that pledged funds are not accompanied by
conditions, explicit or implicit, on hiring decisions or academic operations.
(c) Subject to appropriation, the department shall use resources in the fund to administer
a Full-Time Faculty Pilot Program. The department shall establish guidelines for the program
and distribute resources from the fund by issuing a request for proposal through which public
institutions of higher education may apply for funding to create 1 new full-time faculty position.
Grants awarded under this section shall be competitive, one-time grants and shall be used solely
to support salary and related personnel costs.
The department shall award grants based on demonstrated institutional capacity, need,
readiness to support the faculty position and ability to financially sustain the full-time position
after the grant funds are exhausted. In evaluating proposals, the department shall consider
regional equity to ensure equitable distribution of funds across the commonwealth. The
department shall fund at least 1 campus in each of the following: (i) the University of
Massachusetts segment; (ii) the state university segment; and (iii) the community college
segment.
(d) Not later than 6 months after the completion of the hiring process for a position
funded under this section, each grant recipient shall submit a report to the department including,
but not limited to, the following:
of 7

(i) benefits and challenges experienced in creating the new full-time faculty position;
(ii) how the campus or institution advertised the position internally and externally;
(iii) whether the campus or institution hired an adjunct faculty member or impacted
adjunct faculty member already employed at the same campus or institution and an explanation
of its decision;
(iv) an explanation of the impact of the hire on adjunct faculty at the same institution,
including, but not limited to, whether positions for impacted adjunct faculty were reduced or
eliminated;
(v) an explanation of the institution or campus’ approach to funding fringe benefits for all
eligible employees and for the new full-time employee and any associated challenges; and
(vi) any recommendations for improving the process for hiring full-time faculty at public
institutions of higher education and for achieving a balanced utilization of adjunct faculty at the
recipient’s campus.
(e) Not later than 1 year following the release of the grant funds, the department shall
submit a report analyzing the results of the Full-Time Faculty Pilot Program to the clerks of the
house of representatives and senate, the house and senate committees on ways and means and the
joint committee on higher education. The report shall include, but not be limited to:
(i) the information submitted by grant recipients pursuant to subsection (d);
(ii) the department’s analysis of the compiled reports and any associated trends, patterns
or anomalies;
of 7

(iii) recommendations for improving upon the process and feasibility of hiring full-time
faculty at public institutions of higher education, delineated by segment;
(iv) recommendations for quantifying and achieving a balanced utilization of adjunct
faculty at public institutions of higher education, including, but not limited to, recommendations
addressing the role of fringe benefits on the ability and interest of campuses to hire full-time
faculty members; and
(v) the text of any proposed legislation necessary to carry out its recommendations.
SECTION 2. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Adjunct faculty”, faculty employed at 1 or more public institutions of higher education,
as defined in section 5 of chapter 15A of the General Laws, on a semester-by-semester basis.
“Impacted adjunct faculty”, adjunct faculty, as defined in this section, who cumulatively
work half-time or more at 1 or more public institutions of higher education.
(a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a special commission is
hereby established to develop a system and implementation plan that enables impacted adjunct
faculty members to be eligible for and receive benefits including, but not limited to, health
insurance and retirement benefits that are otherwise available to other benefited public
employees.
(b) The special commission shall include, but not be limited to: the secretary of
administration and finance or a designee, who shall serve as co-chair; the chair of the board of
higher education or a designee, who shall serve as co-chair; the commissioner of higher
of 7

education or a designee; the comptroller or a designee; the executive director of the public
employee retirement administration commission or a designee; the executive director of the
group insurance commission or a designee; the chairs of the joint committee on higher education;
a representative from the the University of Massachusetts segment, appointed by the president of
the University of Massachusetts; a representative from the state university segment, appointed by
the State University Council of Presidents; a representative of the community college segment,
appointed by the Massachusetts Association of Community Colleges; a representative from the
Massachusetts Teachers Association; a representative from the Massachusetts State College
Association; a representative from the Massachusetts Community College Council; 3 members
appointed by the commissioner of higher education who shall represent adjunct faculty from
each of the 3 segments of the Massachusetts public higher education system; and a member of
the student advisory committee to the board of higher education, appointed by the student
advisory committee committee. Subject to appropriation, the executive office of administration
and finance and the department of higher education shall furnish reasonable staff and other
support for the work of the special commission.
(c) The special commission shall collect, review and report on:
(i) current data, practices and strategies on adjunct faculty utilization across the public
higher education system in the commonwealth, including the number and use cases of adjunct
faculty and professional staff and impacted adjunct faculty employed by institution and by
segment, as compared to the number of full-time faculty;
of 7

(ii) the compensation and benefits currently available to adjunct faculty members and
professional staff across the public higher education system in the commonwealth, including
how such costs are borne between institutional resources and state appropriations;
(iii) nationwide best practices in the employment and compensation of adjunct faculty;
100 and
101 (iv) other relevant aspects including the impacts on campuses, students and student
102 outcomes of adjunct faculty utilization.
103 (d) The special commission shall issue recommendations and an implementation plan for
104 providing state benefits to impacted adjunct faculty including, but not limited to:
105 (i) steps necessary to develop a system that allows any impacted adjunct faculty,
106 including those who work in a division of continuing education, regardless of funding source,
107 including but not limited to subsidiary account CC, to be considered an employee eligible for
108 membership in the state employees’ retirement system and able to earn creditable service for
109 such time, or in the optional retirement program;
110 (ii) steps necessary to develop a system that allows any impacted adjunct faculty,
111 including those who work in a division of continuing education, regardless of funding source,
112 including but not limited to subsidiary account CC, to be considered an employee eligible for
113 employee benefits outlined in chapter 32A of the General Laws which are made available to
114 other benefitted half or full-time employees at the same institution;
115 (iii) estimates of annual costs for implementation of clauses (i) and (ii) and proposals for
116 how the commonwealth could fund said costs;
of 7

117 (iv) solutions to barriers that currently prevent or limit public institutions of higher
118 education from increasing the number of full-time faculty positions, including, but not limited to,
119 an analysis of the funding mechanisms currently in place related to hiring additional full-time
120 faculty and recommendations for potential incentives to encourage the hiring of full-time faculty;
121 and
122 (v) additional recommendations for improving access to public benefits, professional
123 development opportunities and other institutional resources for adjunct faculty.
124 (d) Not later than 12 months following the enactment of this act, the working group shall
125 submit its report and recommendations, including the text of any proposed legislation and costs
126 necessary to carry out its recommendations, to the governor, the clerks of the house of
127 representatives and the senate, the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means
128 and the chairs of the joint committee on higher education.
129 SECTION 3. Not later than 90 days following enactment of this act, the department of
130 higher education shall promulgate rules and regulations for the Full-Time Faculty Pilot Program
131 established in section 15H of chapter 15A of the General Laws.
132 SECTION 4. Members shall be appointed to the special commission established in
133 section 2 of this act not later than 30 days following enactment of this act.
of 7